Connecticut, session 2026, HB05314.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Subdivision (2) of section 8-265ccc of the 2026 supplement
2 to the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
3 thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
4 (2) The loan shall (A) be secured by a mortgage deed on the eligible
5 borrower's residential buildings and all related improvements under
6 development by the eligible borrower, (B) be made in accordance with
7 the eligible financial institution's underwriting policy and standards,
8 except that the loan may have a loan-to-value ratio in excess of typical
9 underwriting standards, and (C) bear interest at a rate that does not
10 exceed the [applicable] prime rate [of the Federal Home Loan Bank of
11 Boston for short-term or long-term advances through the New England
12 Fund program. For the purposes of this subdivision, "applicable rate"
13 means the New England Fund rate that (i) is] published [on the Internet
14 web site of the Federal Home Loan Bank of Boston] by The Wall Street
15 Journal as of the date the interest rate is locked in by the eligible
HB5314 / File No. 110 1

HB5314 File No. 110
16 borrower and eligible financial institution. [, and (ii) has an advance
17 term that most closely corresponds to the term of the loan being made
18 by the participating eligible financial institution.]
19 Sec. 2. Section 8-265eee of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
20 is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July
21 1, 2026):
22 Under the program administered by the authority pursuant to
23 subsection (a) of section 8-265bbb, the authority may, within available
24 resources allocated by the State Bond Commission, make loans or issue
25 grants-in-aid to eligible borrowers that are in addition to the loans made
26 to such eligible borrowers by eligible financial institutions pursuant to
27 section 8-265ccc, as amended by this act. The loans made by the
28 authority (1) may be (A) amortizing, (B) deferred, or (C) forgivable as to
29 principal and interest, and (2) shall be [(1)] (A) subordinate to the loans
30 made by eligible financial institutions, and [(2)] (B) subject to such terms
31 as the authority may establish, including, but not limited to, loan
32 amounts, interest rates and terms to maturity. The grants-in-aid issued
33 by the authority shall be subject to such terms as the authority may
34 establish.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 8-265ccc(2)
Sec. 2 July 1, 2026 8-265eee
BA Joint Favorable
HB5314 / File No. 110 2

HB5314 File No. 110
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Treasurer, Debt Serv. GF - See Below See Below See Below
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill makes various changes to the Homes for CT program, a
portion of which is funded through General Obligation (GO) bonds.
Future General Fund debt service costs may be incurred or incurred
sooner due to the program changes to the degree that it causes
authorized GO bond funds to be expended or to be expended more
quickly than they otherwise would have been.
As of March 1, 2026, there is an unallocated bond balance of $10
million under the authorization. The bill does not change overall GO
bond authorization levels.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to any bonds issued.
HB5314 / File No. 110 3

HB5314 File No. 110
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5314
AN ACT CONCERNING THE "HOMES FOR CT" LOAN PROGRAM.